Nebraska, session 109, LB983.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB983 LB983
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 25-331, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
25-331 (1)(a) A defending party may, as a third-party plaintiff,
serve a summons and complaint on a nonparty:
(i) Who is or may be liable to the defending party for all or part
of the claim against the defending party; or
(ii) Whose negligence was or may have been a proximate cause of the
transaction or occurrence that is the subject matter of the plaintiff's
claim and who is not precluded by section 25-21,185.11 from being made a
party.
(b) The third-party plaintiff shall, by motion, obtain the court's
leave if the third-party plaintiff files the third-party complaint more
than fourteen days after serving its original answer.
(c) The person served with the summons and third-party complaint,
hereinafter called the third-party defendant, has all the rights and
obligations of a defendant, including those created by this section and
by the rules promulgated by the Supreme Court pursuant to sections
25-801.01 and 25-1273.01.
(d) The third-party defendant may assert against the plaintiff any
defense that the third-party plaintiff has to the plaintiff's claim. The
third-party defendant may also assert against the plaintiff any claim
arising out of the transaction or occurrence that is the subject matter
of the plaintiff's claim against the third-party plaintiff.
(e) The plaintiff may assert against the third-party defendant any
claim arising out of the transaction or occurrence that is the subject
matter of the plaintiff's claim against the third-party plaintiff.
(f) A defending party may assert against the third-party defendant a
claim that the third-party defendant is or may be liable to the defending
party for all or part of the claim against the defending party.
(g) A third-party defendant may bring in a nonparty if subdivision
(1)(a) of this section would allow a defending party to do so.
-2-

LB983 LB983
2026 2026
(h) Any party may move to strike the third-party claim, to sever it,
or try it separately.
(2) When a claim is asserted against a plaintiff, the plaintiff may
bring in a nonparty if subdivision (1)(a) of this section would allow a
defending party to do so.
Sec. 2. Section 25-1223, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
25-1223 (1) Upon the request of a party to a civil action or
proceeding, a subpoena may be issued to command a person to testify at a
trial or deposition. The term trial in reference to a subpoena includes a
hearing at which testimony may be taken.
(2) The clerk or a judge of the court in which the action or
proceeding is pending shall issue a trial subpoena upon the request of a
party. An attorney, as an officer of the court, may issue and sign a
trial subpoena on behalf of the court if the attorney is authorized to
practice in the court. An attorney who issues a subpoena must file a copy
of the subpoena with the court on the day the subpoena is issued.
(3) A person before whom a deposition may be taken may issue a
deposition subpoena on behalf of the court in which the action or
proceeding is pending. An attorney, as an officer of the court, may issue
and sign a deposition subpoena on behalf of the court if the attorney is
authorized to practice in the court.
(4) A trial subpoena shall state the name of the court from which it
is issued, the title of the action, and the case number and shall command
each person to whom it is directed to appear and testify at the time and
place specified in the subpoena.
(5) A deposition subpoena shall state the name of the court from
which it is issued, the title of the action, and the case number and
shall command each person to whom it is directed to appear and testify at
the time specified in the subpoena. The subpoena shall also:
(a) State the place if the deposition will be taken in-person;
-3-

LB983 LB983
2026 2026
(b) Include a link if the deposition will be taken by
videoconferencing or state that a link will be provided to the person
within a reasonable time before the deposition; or
(c) State the instructions for joining the telephone call if the
deposition will be taken by telephone or state that the instructions will
be provided to the person within a reasonable time before the deposition.
(6) (5) Except as provided in subsection (7) (6) of this section, a
trial subpoena that is issued in a civil action or proceeding (a) at the
request of an agency of state government or (b) pursuant to section
25-2304 shall contain the following statement: As a witness in [insert
name of court], you are entitled to receive a witness fee in the amount
of [insert amount from section 33-139] for each day that you are required
to be in court and, if you live more than one mile from the courthouse,
you are also entitled to receive mileage at the rate that state employees
receive. Ask the lawyer or party who subpoenaed you or the clerk of the
court for information about what you should do to receive the fees and
mileage to which you are entitled.
(7) (6) A trial subpoena in a civil action or proceeding that
commands testimony by an employee of the State of Nebraska or a political
subdivision thereof or a privately employed security guard, under the
circumstances described in section 33-139.01, shall contain the following
statement: As a witness in [insert name of court], you are entitled to be
compensated for your actual and necessary expenses if you are required to
travel outside of your county of residence to testify. Ask the lawyer or
party who subpoenaed you or the clerk of the court for information about
what you should do to receive compensation, if any, to which you are
entitled.
(8) (7) Any other trial subpoena in a civil action or proceeding
shall contain the following statement: As a witness in [insert name of
court], you are entitled to receive a witness fee in the amount of
[insert amount from section 33-139] for each day that you are required to
-4-

LB983 LB983
2026 2026
be in court and, if you live more than one mile from the courthouse, you
are also eligible to receive mileage at the rate that state employees
receive. You should have received your witness fee for one day with this
subpoena. Ask the lawyer or party who subpoenaed you or the clerk of the
court for information about what you should do to receive the additional
fees, if any, and mileage to which you are entitled.
(9) (8) The Supreme Court may promulgate forms for subpoenas for use
in civil and criminal actions and proceedings. Any such forms shall not
be in conflict with the laws governing such matters.
(10) (9) A subpoena may be served by a sheriff or constable. It may
also be served by a person who is twenty-one years of age or older and
who is not a party to the action or proceeding.
Sec. 3. Section 29-1901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1901 (1) The statutes governing subpoenas in civil actions and
proceedings shall also govern subpoenas in traffic and criminal cases,
except that subsections (1), (3), and (4) of section 25-1228 shall not
apply to those cases. The payment of compensation and mileage to
witnesses in those cases shall be governed by section 29-1903.
(2) A trial subpoena in a traffic and criminal case shall contain
the statement specified in subsection (6) (5) of section 25-1223.
Sec. 4. Original sections 25-331, 25-1223, and 29-1901, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-